Hawaii statutes.
§195D-8 Search and seizure. Any
officer or agent authorized pursuant to section 195D-7 shall have the authority
to conduct searches as provided by law and to seize any equipment, business
records, merchandise, aquatic life, wildlife, or land plant taken, possessed,
transported, sold, offered for sale, or used in violation of any section of
this chapter or any rule adopted hereunder, and any of the foregoing so seized
shall be held by the department pending disposition of environmental court
proceedings, or the department prior to forfeiture, may direct the transfer of
aquatic life, wildlife, or land plants so seized to a qualified ichthyological,
zoological, botanical, educational, or scientific institution for safekeeping,
costs thereof to be paid by the defendant. Upon conviction of the person or
persons from whom the seizure was made, the environmental court shall declare
the items seized forfeited to the State. Such items shall be destroyed or
disposed of in any manner as the department may deem appropriate. [L 1975, c
65, pt of §1; am L 1983, c 111, §9; am L 2014, c 218, §8]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next